Mississippi, session 2026, HB1514.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. Before the completion of any real estate closing, a purchaser must be provided notice that ad valorem taxes are due on the subject real estate unless it is exempt from ad valorem taxation, that the payment of ad valorem taxes on the subject real estate may be in arrears and that the subject real estate may have been sold for the nonpayment of ad valorem taxes. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.